Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-125
Tax situs, defined.

Tax situs means the tax district wherein taxable real property is located or taxable tangible personal property is located for fifty percent or more of the calendar year. Taxable tangible personal property of a business shall be assessed at the location of the business unless the property has acquired tax situs elsewhere.

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 8;

Laws 1999, LB 194, § 9.